Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-604. Workfare participants excluded.

A workfare participant by participating in workfare does not enter into any employment contract, expressed or implied, with the State of Arkansas or its several political subdivisions. Participation in the project is for the purpose of retaining food stamp benefits and not for employment with the State of Arkansas or its political subdivisions.

The relationship of a workfare participant to the State of Arkansas or to any of its political subdivisions shall not be deemed to be an employer-employee relationship.

Workfare participants shall not be considered public employees covered by the state workers' compensation funds and therefore are excluded from workers' compensation coverage under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 916, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3609 — 12-3611.

21-5-605. Public Employee Claims Division.

There is created a Public Employee Claims Division within the State Insurance Department.

The Director of the Public Employee Claims Division shall be appointed by the Insurance Commissioner.

The division is designated as the unit of state government primarily responsible for the administration of public employee workers' compensation claims in the State of Arkansas.

Upon payment of compensation to or on behalf of any public employee, the division shall notify the appropriate public employer involved.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 809, §§ 4, 5; 1981, No. 929, § 4; 1985, No. 285, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3604, 12-3605.

21-5-606. Division attorneys.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 809, § 7; 1981, No. 929, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3607.

21-5-607. Claim, review, and appeal procedures.

To the extent not in conflict with this subchapter, the method and procedure of filing claims on behalf of the public employee and the review and appeal of compensation orders or awards of the Workers' Compensation Commission shall be the same as those provided by law and the rules of the commission, with respect to claims filed by private employers and employees.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 809, § 5; 1981, No. 929, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3605; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2325.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

21-5-608. Report of injury, death, or exposure.

The appropriate public employer shall file with the Public Employee Claims Division, within ten (10) days after receiving notice of any personal injury, death, or occupational disease of any public employee, a report:

Showing the date, time, and place of the injury, death, or exposure;

Stating briefly the circumstances and extent of the injury, death, or exposure;

Stating the name of the injured or deceased person; and

Stating the names of all the witnesses.

The report shall be made on forms approved by the division.

Actually engaged in emergency service duties, either during training or during a period of emergency; and

Under the supervision and instruction and subject to the order or control of, or serving pursuant to a request of, the Governor, the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, or the chief executive officer of a county or local government unit making use of emergency volunteer workers.

For the purpose of workers' compensation coverage in cases of injury to or death of an individual, all duly registered and qualified emergency services volunteer workers shall be deemed local government or state employees and shall receive compensation and their survivors shall receive death benefits in the same manner as regular local government or state employees for injury or death arising out of and in the course of their activities as emergency services volunteer workers.

If an emergency services volunteer worker is injured or killed while subject to the order or control of a local government, compensation and benefits shall be charged against the applicable local government's experience rate and paid from the appropriate state workers' compensation fund.

If the emergency services volunteer worker was under the order or control of a state agency when injured or killed, compensation and benefits shall be charged against the experience rate of the state agency which exercised order or control at the time of injury or death and paid from the appropriate state workers' compensation fund.

For the purpose of subsection (c) of this section, the weekly compensation benefits for an emergency services volunteer worker who receives no monetary compensation for services rendered as such a worker shall be calculated based upon the wages received from his or her regular or usual employment, the same as a regular local or state employee, with respect to injury, disability, or death.

The reimbursement of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or less for out-of-pocket expenses for gasoline, oil, uniforms, required equipment, or similar expenses incurred in response to an emergency situation shall not be construed to be monetary compensation for the emergency services volunteer worker.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(2).

The 2005 amendment, in (d)(2), substituted “expenses for” for “expenses incurred in response to an emergency situation such as” and “or similar expenses incurred in response to an emergency situation” for “et cetera” and deleted “and” preceding “required.”

History.

Acts 1979, No. 809, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3606.

21-5-609. Benefits for emergency service volunteer workers.

Benefits payable for the injury or death of a person appointed and regularly enrolled in an emergency services organization and covered by this subchapter shall be limited to the provisions of the Workers' Compensation Law, §11-9-101 et seq. Such benefits are payable if the injury or death occurred while the person was:

The remedy provided in this section shall be the exclusive remedy as against the state and political subdivisions of the state.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 809, § 5; 1981, No. 929, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3605; Acts 1999, No. 646, § 65; 2005, No. 1962, § 99.

21-5-610. Workers' compensation benefits in conjunction with certain other benefits.

In the event that any public employee is entitled to receive workers' compensation benefits under the provisions of this subchapter, as a result of injury, disability, or death, and the injury, disability, or death also gives rise to an entitlement of benefits under a state or federal program or an act of the United States Congress which provides benefits for public safety officers who serve a public agency in an official capacity, with or without compensation, as a law enforcement officer or as a firefighter or in any other capacity, the state workers' compensation funds shall be entitled to a credit against its liability for payment of workers' compensation benefits to the extent of the benefits received under any state or federal program or act of the United States Congress.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 809, § 5; 1981, No. 929, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3605.

Publisher's Notes. This section was held to be preempted by federal law in Rose v. Arkansas State Police. See case note.

Subchapter 7

— Death Benefits

Cross References. Accumulated leave or vacation, §21-4-401 et seq.

Death benefits for State Police Officers, or any police officer in the State Highway and Transportation Department, §12-8-212.

Effective Dates. Acts 1973, No. 150, § 2: July 1, 1973.

Acts 1987, No. 349, §§ 3, 5: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that emergency medical technicians are not currently covered by the law which provides for death benefits for survivors of law enforcement officers and firefighters. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989, No. 15, § 7: Jan. 1, 1988. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under current law there is no provision made for the surviving parents of a law enforcement officer injured or killed in the line of duty to be eligible for payment of claims as currently provided for, and it is the intention of the General Assembly to rectify this inequity in the law by passage of this Act. Therefore, an emergency is declared and this Act being immediately necessary to the preservation of public peace, health and safety shall be in full force from January 1, 1988.”

Acts 1999, No. 630, § 5: Mar. 16, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that at least one dependent child of a disabled policeman who would have been entitled to scholarship benefits had application been made prior to August 31, 1997, but who was denied those benefits because the minor is just now graduating from high school; and whereas this act will allow that child to apply for the scholarship benefits provided for the children of totally disabled policemen; and whereas unless this emergency clause is adopted this act will not be in effect until after the beginning of the fall college semester. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

21-5-701. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Child” or “children” means any natural child, adopted child, or stepchild who is eligible under § 21-5-707;

“Coroner” means a coroner or a deputy coroner who is engaged in official duty at a crime scene or death location;

“Covered public employee” means a police officer, firefighter, state highway employee, state correction employee, Division of Community Correction employee, jailer, qualified emergency services worker, wildlife enforcement officer, emergency medical technician, Arkansas Forestry Commission employee, commissioned law enforcement personnel, member of the Arkansas National Guard on state active duty, or emergency response personnel of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;

“Division of Community Correction employee” means any employee of the Division of Community Correction who is subject to injury through contact with parolees, probationers, or center residents;

“Emergency medical technician” means emergency medical services personnel as defined in § 20-13-202;

“Firefighter” means any member of a fire department or firefighting unit of any city of the first class or city of the second class, or any town, or any unincorporated rural area of this state who actively engages in the fighting of fires on either a regular or voluntary basis, or any instructor of the Arkansas Fire Training Academy, or any member of the firefighting organization of the Arkansas National Guard Robinson Maneuver Training Center or of the Arkansas National Guard Fort Chaffee Maneuver Training Center;

“Jailer” means an employee of a city, town, or county who, while engaged in official duty as a detention or transport officer, is subject to injury through contact with inmates, detainees, parolees, or probationers;

“Police officer” means:

Any law enforcement officer engaged in official duty who is a member of any regular or auxiliary police force on a full-time or part-time basis, the Division of Arkansas State Police, or any member of the law enforcement organization of the Arkansas National Guard Robinson Maneuver Training Center or of the Arkansas National Guard Fort Chaffee Maneuver Training Center;

A sheriff or deputy sheriff of a county who is engaged in official duty; or

A constable or night marshal of a town of this state engaged in official duty;

“Qualified emergency services worker” means a state, local, volunteer, and other emergency responder as defined in § 12-75-103;

“State correction employee” means an employee of the Division of Correction or the Corrections School System who is subject to injury through contact with inmates or parolees of the Division of Correction;

“State highway employee” means an employee of the Arkansas Department of Transportation who is physically present on a roadway, bridge, or right-of-way of the state highway system or other public transportation facility and who is:

Actively engaged in highway maintenance, construction, traffic operations, or the official duties of his or her employment; or

Supervising, reviewing, evaluating, or inspecting highway maintenance, construction, or traffic operations; and

“Wildlife enforcement officer” means an employee of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission who actively engages, on a full-time or part-time basis, in the enforcement of the boating safety laws and regulations enacted for the protection of game, fish, furbearing animals, and other wildlife of the State of Arkansas.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment arranged the subdivisions in alphabetical order; in (2), inserted “Department of Community Correction employee” and substituted “State” for “Arkansas” preceding “Forestry”; inserted present (3); substituted “means” for “shall mean” in present (5); and added (10).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (9).

The 2015 amendment inserted (2) and (7) and redesignated remaining subdivisions accordingly; inserted “jailer” in (3); substituted “services personnel” for “technicians” in (5); inserted “city of the” preceding “second class” in (6); substituted “Arkansas National Guard Robinson Maneuver Training Center or of the Arkansas National Guard Fort Chaffee Maneuver Training Center” for “Camp Robinson Military Reservation or of Fort Chaffee” in (6) and (8)(A); substituted “responder” for “services worker” in (9); and substituted “Corrections School System” for “Department of Correction School District” in (10).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (11).

The 2019 amendment by No. 767 inserted “member of the Arkansas National Guard on state active duty” in (3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (3), substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”, and substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “State Parks Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism”; substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” twice in (4); and substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” twice in (10).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 43, § 1; 1973, No. 399, § 1; 1977, No. 812, § 1; 1977, No. 936, § 1; 1981, No. 437, § 1; 1981, No. 890, § 1; 1985, No. 839, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2347; Acts 1987, No. 349, § 1; 1987, No. 404, § 1; 1991, No. 409, § 1; 1997, No. 547, § 1; 2001, No. 113, § 4; 2013, No. 543, § 1; 2015, No. 1058, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
73; 2019, No. 767, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
998-1000.

21-5-702. Jurisdiction of Arkansas State Claims Commission regarding claims filed under subchapter.

The Arkansas State Claims Commission is vested with exclusive jurisdiction of, or authority with respect to, all claims filed against the state under this subchapter.

The commission shall make a determination as to whether a death or total and permanent disability was or was not in the official line of duty.

The date of the covered public employee's death;

The date of the incident causing the covered public employee's total and permanent disability; or

The date the covered public employee permanently leaves the employment position covered by this subchapter.

Unless § 6-82-504(e) is applicable, the commission shall award any scholarship benefit provided by the provisions of § 6-82-501 et seq. at the same time any death benefit or total and permanent disability benefit is awarded under this subchapter.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment, in the introductory paragraph of (d), deleted “State Police employee or” following “child of any,” and inserted “Arkansas” and “or law enforcement officer”; substituted “March 16, 1999” for “August 1, 1997” in (d)(3); and made stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment deleted “Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section” in (b); and deleted (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

A person who claims a benefit under this section to which the beneficiaries of a deceased person are entitled shall submit a notarized affidavit provided by the Arkansas State Claims Commission that:

Lists all known surviving children of the decedent, their respective ages, last known addresses, and contact information; and

Discloses the existence of any last will and testament of the decedent.

If a person who claims a benefit fails to list all known surviving children as required by subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section, the Arkansas State Claims Commission may require that the person return the benefit to the Arkansas State Claims Commission for further proceedings.

As used in this section, “surviving dependent children” means children who have not yet reached the age of majority as of the date of the award and children who have a legal incapacity that renders them dependent even after reaching the age of majority.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 1313, § 4, provided: “The provisions of this act are retroactive to July 1, 2008.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “their designated beneficiaries” in the section heading; inserted “designated beneficiary or, if there is no designated beneficiary, then to the” in (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(B); substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)”in (a)(1)(A); rewrote (b); inserted “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)” in (c); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 785 rewrote (a)(1); substituted “If” for “In the event” and “suffers” for “shall suffer” in (a)(2)(A); and added (d) and (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” twice in (b)(2)(A) and in (c).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Arkansas Law Survey, Baker, Workers' Compensation, 9 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 213.

Police officer, wildlife enforcement officer, commissioned law enforcement officer or emergency response employee of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, Division of Community Correction employee, employee of the Division of Correction, jailer, or coroner whose death occurred:

After January 1, 2003; and

Either:

In the official line of duty as the result of a criminal or negligent action of another person or persons or as the result of the engagement in exceptionally hazardous duty; or

In the line of duty while the officer or employee was performing emergency medical activities;

Firefighter, emergency medical technician, or employee of the Arkansas Forestry Commission killed after July 1, 1987, while responding to, engaging in, or returning from a fire, a rescue incident, a hazardous material or bomb incident, an emergency medical activity, or simulated training thereof; and

Firefighter killed in the line of duty after January 1, 2012, including death from leukemia, lymphoma, mesothelioma, and multiple myeloma and cancer of the brain, digestive tract, urinary tract, liver, skin, breast, cervix, thyroid, prostate, testicle, or a cancer that has been found by research and statistics to show higher instances of occurrence in firefighters than in the general population, if he or she was exposed to a known carcinogen as determined by the Department of Health with consideration to the findings of the International Agency for Research on Cancer while in the official line of duty.

Subdivision (a)(3)(A)(i) of this section does not include a firefighter who was diagnosed with cancer prior to the start of firefighter service.

A death benefit under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section shall be limited to:

A maximum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) per individual death, including educational benefits provided in § 6-82-501 et seq.; and

A firefighter who is under sixty-eight (68) years of age.

The Firefighter Benefit Review Panel is created for the purpose of making recommendations to the Arkansas State Claims Commission regarding determinations of death benefits under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section for deaths associated with cancer.

The panel shall consist of the following seven (7) individuals to be appointed by the Governor:

One (1) licensed oncologist;

(1)Two (2) firefighters paid by the state, a county, or a municipality.

(1)Two (2) volunteer firefighters.

One (1) fire chief who may be appointed from a list of names submitted by the Arkansas Association of Fire Chiefs; and

One (1) citizen with experience in either cancer and healthcare professions or firefighter relations.

(a)Panel members shall serve a term of four (4) years.

In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the panel, the Governor shall appoint a person meeting the applicable eligibility requirements of the vacated position to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(a)The panel shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting in each calendar year at a time and place determined by the panel.

Special meetings may be called at the discretion of the chair selected under subdivision (a)(3)(C)(v) of this section.

The panel shall select a chair and vice chair during the first annual meeting of each four-year term.

Four (4) members of the panel constitute a quorum to transact business.

The members of the panel may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

The panel shall:

Render advisory opinions and reports concerning research and statistics that show higher instances of cancer among firefighters;

Review claims for death benefits of firefighters who have died of cancer; and

Make recommendations to the Arkansas State Claims Commission on death benefit awards under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section.

This section:

Does not apply to any other benefits granted by the state, a county, a city, or a municipality; and

Does not grant a cause of action against the state, a county, a city, or a municipality.

In addition to the benefits provided for in subsection (a) of this section, the state shall pay the additional sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to the qualified recipient of any police officer, wildlife enforcement officer of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, commissioned law enforcement officer of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, Division of Community Correction employee, or employee of the Division of Correction:

After July 1, 1989; and

In the official line of duty as the result of a criminal action of another person or persons.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, the benefits shall be paid totally from state funds appropriated for these benefits. The funds shall not be reimbursed by a transfer or charging the funds against any state funds allocated for turnback to cities or counties or distributed to any other state department agency fund account other than the Arkansas State Claims Commission fund accounts and the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund.

The appropriate state department agency shall transfer the necessary funds to the Arkansas State Claims Commission fund accounts for payment.

The additional benefits provided in this section shall be paid to the qualified recipient in four (4) equal annual payments, the first of which shall be paid immediately upon entry of the order awarding the benefits, and the next three (3) payments shall be paid in July of the next three (3) fiscal years after the date of the original order of the Arkansas State Claims Commission establishing entitlement to additional payments.

Determination of eligibility for the additional payments provided in this section shall be made by the Arkansas State Claims Commission in accordance with Arkansas State Claims Commission rules and procedures.

A person who claims a benefit as a qualified recipient under this section to which the beneficiaries of a deceased person are entitled shall submit a notarized affidavit provided by the Arkansas State Claims Commission that:

Lists all known surviving children of the decedent, their respective ages, last known addresses, and contact information; and

Discloses the existence of any last will and testament of the decedent.

If a person who claims a benefit as a qualified recipient fails to list all known surviving children as required by subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section, the Arkansas State Claims Commission may require that the person return the benefit to the Arkansas State Claims Commission for further proceedings.

If a benefit under this section is payable to both the surviving spouse and other eligible persons such as surviving children, the Arkansas State Claims Commission shall hold a hearing to determine how the benefit shall be distributed among the eligible persons if those percentages are not already provided for by law.

As used in this section:

“Qualified recipient” means a beneficiary of an award or allowance under this section with the following priority for eligibility and distribution to a beneficiary:

If the person has a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries are entitled to the award or allowance, in whatever percentage indicated by the covered public employee;

Subject to subdivision (h)(1)(C) of this section, if the person has no designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, the award or allowance shall go to the person's surviving spouse;

If the person has a surviving spouse and surviving dependent children, the surviving spouse is entitled to fifty percent (50%) of the award or allowance and the surviving dependent children are entitled to the other fifty percent (50%) of the award or allowance in equal shares; or

If the person is unmarried at the date of his or her death:

The person's surviving dependent children split the award or allowance in equal shares;

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 1313, § 4, provided: “The provisions of this act are retroactive to July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2015, No. 341, § 2, provided:

“Initial appointment of Firefighter Benefit Review Panel members.

“Within thirty (30) days of July 22, 2015, the Governor shall appoint the initial members of the Firefighter Benefit Review Panel and designate one (1) member of the panel to call the first meeting of the panel.”

Amendments. The 1999 amendment inserted “or employee of the Arkansas Forestry Commission” in (a).

The 2001 amendment rewrote (a) and (b).

The 2003 amendment substituted “specified public employees” for “certain officers” in the section heading; substituted “January 1, 2003” for “July 1, 1987” in (a)(1)(A); rewrote (a)(1)(B)(i); inserted “Arkansas” in (a)(2); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment inserted “designated beneficiaries or” in the section heading; substituted “one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)” for “seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000)” in the introductory language of (a); inserted “designated beneficiary” in the introductory language of (a) and in (d); inserted “designated beneficiary, surviving” in the introductory language of (b); rewrote (c); and made minor punctuation changes.

The 2015 amendment by No. 341 substituted “under twenty-two (22) years of age of a” for “under the age of twenty-two (22) of any” in (a); and added (a)(3).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1058, in the introductory language of (a)(1), deleted “of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission” following “wildlife enforcement officer” and inserted “jailer, or coroner”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 785 substituted “qualified recipient or recipients” for “designated beneficiary, surviving spouse, or surviving children under twenty-two (22) years of age” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “constitute” for “shall constitute” in (a)(3)(C)(vi); substituted “Does not apply” for “Shall not be applied” in (a)(3)(D)(i); substituted “qualified recipient” for “designated beneficiary, surviving spouse, or surviving children under twenty-two (22) years of age” in the introductory language of (b); rewrote (d); and added (f) through (h).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “State Parks Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism”, “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”, and “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1) and the introductory language of (b); and inserted “or the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Arkansas Law Survey, Baker, Workers' Compensation, 9 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 213.

Cited: Brewer v. Lacefield, 301 Ark. 358, 784 S.W.2d 156 (1990).

The natural child must have been born prior to the date of the covered public employee's death or total and permanent disability; or

The covered public employee or the covered public employee's spouse must have been pregnant with the natural child at the time of the covered public employee's death or total and permanent disability.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 1313, § 4, provided: “The provisions of this act are retroactive to July 1, 2008.”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “the” preceding “five (5) previous income years” twice in (d).

The 2009 amendment added “Unless designated as the beneficiary of a covered public employee under §21-5-708” in the introductory language of (a) through (d).

Upon a change of beneficiary, the employer shall notify the previous beneficiary within thirty (30) days after the change of beneficiary occurred.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 1313, § 4, provided: “The provisions of this act are retroactive to July 1, 2008.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “witnessed” for “notarized” in (a)(2); deleted (a)(3)(A); and redesignated (a)(3)(B) as (a)(3).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Miscellaneous, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 593.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 43, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2349; Acts 1997, No. 547, § 2.

21-5-703. Procedures for filing claims.

All claimants shall be subject to the same rules as are provided by the law governing procedure before the Arkansas State Claims Commission.

All claims asserted under this subchapter shall be filed within five (5) years of the following:

History.

Acts 1969, No. 43, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2349; Acts 1997, No. 547, § 3; 1999, No. 630, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 100; 2019, No. 315, § 2326.

21-5-704. Payment of claim to covered public employees, their designated beneficiaries, or their survivors — Funds — Definition.

(1)(A)The state shall pay to the beneficiaries of any covered public employee who is killed in the official line of duty, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) with the following requirements for distribution of the award:

If the covered public employee has a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries are entitled to the award, in whatever percentage indicated by the covered public employee;

Subject to subdivision (a)(1)(A)(iii) of this section, if the covered public employee has no designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, the award shall go to the covered public employee's surviving spouse;

If the covered public employee has a surviving spouse and surviving dependent children, the surviving spouse is entitled to fifty percent (50%) of the award, and the surviving dependent children are entitled to the other fifty percent (50%) of the award in equal shares; or

If the covered public employee is unmarried at the date of his or her death:

The covered public employee's surviving dependent children split the award in equal shares;

The covered public employee's children split the award in equal shares if there are no surviving dependent children; or

The covered public employee's surviving parents split the award in equal shares if there are no surviving children.

In addition thereto, the municipality that employed the police officer or firefighter shall, upon certification of the amount by the police or fire department, pay to the beneficiaries of the deceased police officer or firefighter an allowance for all sick leave, vacation, or other leave time accumulated to the credit of the police officer or firefighter at the time of his or her death, with the following requirements for distribution of the allowance:

If the deceased police officer or firefighter has a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries are entitled to the allowance, in whatever percentage indicated by the covered public employee;

Subject to subdivision (a)(1)(B)(iii) of this section, if the deceased police officer or firefighter has no designated beneficiary or beneficiaries, the allowance shall go to the deceased police officer's or firefighter's surviving spouse;

If the deceased police officer or firefighter has a surviving spouse and surviving dependent children, the surviving spouse is entitled to fifty percent (50%) of the allowance and the surviving dependent children are entitled to the other fifty percent (50%) of the allowance in equal shares; or

If the deceased police officer or firefighter is unmarried at the date of his or her death:

The deceased police officer's or firefighter's surviving dependent children split the allowance in equal shares;

The deceased police officer's or firefighter's children split the allowance in equal shares if there are no surviving dependent children; or

The deceased police officer's or firefighter's surviving parents split the allowance in equal shares if there are no surviving children.

(A)If a covered public employee suffers an injury while engaged in the performance of official duties resulting in his or her total and permanent disability, the disabled covered public employee shall be entitled to the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) from the State of Arkansas upon establishing proof of the total and permanent disability.

Proof of total and permanent disability shall be established by offering evidence that the covered public employee was unable to work in the employment position covered by this subchapter for a period of more than one (1) year or that the covered public employee received a disability rating in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) from the Workers' Compensation Commission.

(1)All allowances as provided for in this section for the designated beneficiary, surviving spouse, surviving children, or surviving parents of covered public employees killed while performing official duties, or allowances provided covered public employees who are totally and permanently disabled while performing official duties, shall be paid totally from state funds appropriated therefor.

(A)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section, the funds shall not be reimbursed by transfer or charging the funds against any state funds allocated for turnback to cities or counties or distributed to the State Highway and Transportation Department Fund or distributed to any Division of Correction fund account or any other state department agency fund account other than the Arkansas State Claims Commission fund accounts and the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund or state funds levied for firefighters, police officers, employees of the Arkansas Department of Transportation, and employees of the Division of Correction for pension purposes.

(i)Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) provided in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be paid by the appropriate state department agency fund account.

The appropriate state department agency shall transfer the necessary funds to the Arkansas State Claims Commission fund accounts for payment.

It is the intent of this subchapter that twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the total obligation of providing the benefits provided by this subchapter, even though the funds are to be administered by the Arkansas State Claims Commission, are to be defrayed from state funds and are not to be charged against, or recovered against, any turnback moneys due the cities or counties of this state or allocated to the state highway system of this state or to the Division of Correction or any other state department agency fund account other than the Arkansas State Claims Commission fund accounts and the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 43, § 2; 1973, No. 150, § 1; 1973, No. 399, § 2; 1977, No. 936, § 2; 1981, No. 890, § 2; 1985, No. 839, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2348; Acts 1987, No. 349, § 2; 1989, No. 15, §§ 1, 2; 1989, No. 345, § 2; 1997, No. 547, § 4; 2009, No. 1313, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
74; 2019, No. 785, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§
1001, 1002.